Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.065

Acceptance as certified, registered, foundation, or breeder planting stock.

The director may accept as certified, registered, foundation, or breeder planting stock any planting stock grown or produced by Washington State University, the United States department of agriculture or other propagators whose plant materials are produced in conformance with the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.

[ 1999 c 144 s 7; 1961 c 83 s 11. Formerly RCW 15.14.110.]